Colorado, session 2026A, HB1370.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-701, amend
(2)(a)(I); and add (2)(a)(I.5) as follows:
44-30-701. Limited gaming fund - created - repeal.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, at the
end of the 2012-13 state fiscal year and at the end of each state fiscal year
thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer the state share as follows:
(I) AT THE END OF THE 2012-13 STATE FISCAL YEAR AND EACH
FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THROUGH THE END OF THE 2024-25 STATE FISCAL
YEAR, fifteen million dollars to the Colorado travel and tourism promotion
fund created in section 24-49.7-106;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(I.5) AT THE END OF THE 2025-26 STATE FISCAL YEAR AND EACH
STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER:
(A) ONE MILLION DOLLARS TO THE MUSEUM AND PRESERVATION
OPERATIONS ACCOUNT WITHIN THE STATE HISTORICAL FUND, CREATED IN
SECTION 44-30-1201 (5)(c)(I)(B); AND
(B) FOURTEEN MILLION DOLLARS TO THE COLORADO TRAVEL AND
TOURISM PROMOTION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-49.7-106.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-1201, amend
(5)(c)(I)(B) as follows:
44-30-1201. State historical fund - administration - legislative
declaration - state museum cash fund - rules - definition.
(5) (c) (I) All money received by the society from limited gaming
revenues pursuant to section 44-30-701 (1)(d)(II) shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the state historical fund. Eighty
percent of the state historical fund administered by the society is divided
into the following two accounts:
(B) The museum and preservation operations account, hereby
created in the state historical fund, that consists of forty-nine and
nine-tenths of one percent of the money received from the society in a fiscal
year, AND THE MONEY TRANSFERRED TO THE ACCOUNT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 44-30-701 (2)(a)(I.5)(A). Money in the account is subject to annual
appropriation by the general assembly for the purposes set forth in
subsection (5)(b) of this section.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1370

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1370